Mississippi, session 2026, HB4140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Janice Johnson-Ball of Harrison County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Manslaughter in Harrison County, on August 8, 1993, for which she was sentenced to serve twelve (12) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released from custody on July 29, 1998.  She was sentenced on February 19, 2001, for the charge of False Pretense, for which she was sentenced to serve thirty-six (36) months of supervised probation. She was discharged from probation on February 25, 2004.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.